California statutes. Vehicle Code
If a purchaser of a vehicle pays to the dealer an amount for the licensing or transfer of title of the vehicle, which amount is in excess of the actual fees due for such licensing or transfer, or which amount is in excess of the amount which has been paid, prior to the sale, by the dealer to the state in order to avoid penalties that would have accrued because of late payment of such fees, the dealer shall return such excess amount to the purchaser, whether or not such purchaser requests the return of the excess amount.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 11713.3 by Stats. 1979, Ch. 943.)
-------------------------------------------

11713.5.

(a) It is unlawful and a violation of this code for the holder of any license issued under this article to display for sale, offer for sale, or sell, a motor vehicle, representing the motor vehicle to be of a year model different from the year model designated at the time of manufacture or first assembly as a completed vehicle.

(b) It is unlawful and a violation of this code for the holder of any license issued under this article to directly or indirectly authorize or advise another holder of a license issued under this article to change the year model of a motor
 vehicle in the inventory of the other holder.

(c) It is unlawful and a violation of this code for the holder of any license issued under this article to display for sale, offer for sale, or sell, a housecar which has been manufactured in two or more stages, unless the licensee informs the buyer that the housecar has been so manufactured and the licensee provides the buyer with a form, approved by the department, which sets forth the date of chassis and engine manufacture and the date and model year of the other stages of the vehicle. The licensee shall retain a copy of the form, which shall be signed by the purchaser prior to entering into any sales contract, indicating that the purchaser has received a copy of the form.

(d) This section does not apply to the displaying or offering for sale, or selling, of any new motortruck or truck tractor weighing over 10,000 pounds.

(e) This section does not apply to a vehicle which has been remanufactured by a licensed remanufacturer. The year model of a remanufactured vehicle will be the year the vehicle was remanufactured.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1286, Sec. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

11713.6.

(a) It is unlawful and a violation of this code for the holder of any dealer’s license issued under this article to fail to disclose in writing to the buyer or lessee of a new motor vehicle, that the vehicle, as equipped, may not be operated on a highway signed for the requirement of tire chains if the owner’s manual or other material provided by the manufacturer states that the vehicle, as equipped, may not be operated with tire chains.

(b) The disclosure required under
 subdivision (a) shall meet both of the following requirements:

(1) The disclosure shall be printed in not less than 14-point boldface type on a single sheet of paper that contains no information other than the disclosure.

(2) The disclosure shall include the following language in capital letters: “AS EQUIPPED, THIS VEHICLE MAY NOT BE OPERATED WITH TIRE CHAINS BUT MAY ACCOMMODATE SOME OTHER TYPE OF TIRE TRACTION DEVICE. SEE THE OWNER’S MANUAL FOR DETAILS.”

(c) Prior to the sale or lease, the dealer shall present the disclosure statement for the buyer’s or lessee’s signature and then shall provide the buyer or lessee with a copy of the signed disclosure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 452, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

11713.7.

Disclosure to a buyer that a vehicle has been remanufactured is required. Disclosure shall be accomplished by all of the following:

(a) Oral notification to the buyer.

(b) The statement “THIS VEHICLE HAS BEEN REMANUFACTURED AND CONTAINS USED OR RECONDITIONED PARTS” shall appear in a type size at least the same as the bulk of the text on the purchase order or conditional sales contract signed by the buyer.

(c) The statement that the vehicle is remanufactured and
 contains used or reconditioned parts shall appear in any advertisement pertaining to remanufactured vehicles.

(d) Remanufactured vehicles displayed for retail purposes shall be clearly designated as remanufactured. The disclosure statement required in subdivision (b) shall appear on the vehicle or at the location where the vehicles are displayed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1286, Sec. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

11713.8.

It is unlawful and a violation of this code for a remanufacturer licensed under this code to fail to do any of the following:

(a) Report to the department an existing vehicle identification number when a used frame is utilized.

(b) Die stamp the vehicle identification number to the frame of the vehicle when a new vehicle identification number is assigned.

(c) Disclose that a vehicle is remanufactured and contains used or reconditioned parts as required by Section
 11713.7.

(d) Remove the trade name of the original manufacturer from the vehicle, unless the remanufacturer and the original manufacturer are same.

(e) Maintain for three years bills of sale or invoices for used parts utilized in a remanufactured vehicle.

(f) Maintain for three years proof that the vehicle was reported dismantled, as required by Section 5500 or 11520, when a used frame is utilized in a remanufactured vehicle.

(g) Disclose, on the vehicle identification number plate or label, that the vehicle is remanufactured and includes used parts.

(h) Disclose to the dealer on a document signed by the dealer that the vehicle is remanufactured and contains used parts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1286, Sec. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

11713.9.

(a) It is unlawful and a violation of this code for the holder of a dealer’s license to knowingly display for sale or offer for sale any new motor vehicle specified in subdivision (b) with an engine manufactured by a manufacturer that is not the same as the vehicle manufacturer, as defined in Section 9980, unless the vehicle is prominently labeled as specified in Section 9981.

(b) This section applies only to new passenger vehicles and to new motortrucks with an unladen weight under 6,000 pounds, except housecars.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1264, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11713.10.

It is unlawful and a violation of this code to sell a low-speed vehicle, as defined in Section 385.5, without disclosing to the buyer the vehicle’s maximum speed and the potential risks of driving a low-speed vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 140, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

11713.11.

No holder of a dealer’s license shall do any of the following when conducting an auction of vehicles to the public:

(a) Advertise that a vehicle will be auctioned to the public unless all of the following information is clearly and conspicuously disclosed in the advertisement:

(1) The date or the day of the week of the public auction, or if subdivision (b) applies to the auction, the date of the public auction.

(2) The location of the public auction.

(3) Whether a fee will be charged to attend the auction and the amount of that fee.

(4) The name and dealer number of the auctioning dealer.

(5) Whether a buyer’s fee will be charged to a purchaser, in addition to the accepted auction bid price, and, if the fee is a set amount, the dollar amount of that fee. If the buyer’s fee is not a set amount, the advertisement shall state the formula or percentage used to calculate the fee.

(b) If vehicles seized by a federal, state, or local public agency or authority are being advertised, advertise that a vehicle will be auctioned to the public unless, in addition to the information required by subdivision (a),
 the following information is clearly and conspicuously disclosed in the advertisement:

(1) A good faith estimate of the number of vehicles to be auctioned at that date.

(2) A good faith estimate of the number of vehicles seized by a federal, state, or local public agency or authority to be auctioned at that date.

(c) Fail, on the day of auction, to identify each vehicle seized by a federal, state, or local public agency or authority, either in a printed catalog or orally, before bidding begins on the vehicle.

(d) Include in the total price of an auctioned vehicle any costs to the purchaser at the completion of the sale, except the accepted auction bid price, taxes, vehicle registration fees, any charge for emission testing, not to exceed fifty dollars
 ($50), plus the actual fees charged to a consumer for a certificate pursuant to Section 44060 of the Health and Safety Code, any dealer document preparation charge not exceeding forty-five dollars ($45), and any buyer’s fee.

(e) Charge a buyer’s fee, unless the dealer conducting the auction delivers to any person permitted to submit bids, and at a time prior to accepting any bids from that person, a disclosure statement required by this subdivision and signed by that person. The disclosure statement, if the buyer’s fee is a set amount, shall disclose the amount of the fee, or if the buyer’s fee is not a set amount, disclose the formula or percentage used to calculate the fee. The disclosure statement shall be on a separate 812 x 11 inch sheet of paper. Except for the information set forth in this subdivision, the disclosure statement shall not
 contain any other text, except as necessary to identify the dealer conducting the auction sale and to disclose the amount, percentage, or formula used to calculate the buyer’s fee, and to provide for the date and the person’s acknowledgment of receipt. The heading shall be printed in no smaller than 24-point bold type and the text of the statement shall be printed in no smaller than 12-point type and shall read substantially as follows:BUYER’S FEE REQUIRED
A buyer’s fee is an amount charged by the auctioning dealer for conducting the auction sale. If your bid price is accepted as the winning bid on any vehicle, you will be charged a buyer’s fee in addition to the accepted bid price.
The buyer’s fee that will be added
 to your accepted bid price is
 $ ________________________________.ORThe buyer’s fee that will be added to your accepted bid price will be calculated as follows (insert percentage or other formula for calculating the buyer’s fee):The buyer’s fee is part of the purchase price and is subject to sales tax.Date: ______________ Signature of Bidder ________________________(f) Fail to comply with or violate this chapter, Title 2.95 (commencing with Section 1812.600) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code, Section 2328 of the Commercial Code, or Section 535 of the Penal Code, or any law administered by the State Board of Equalization,
 relating to the auctioneering business, including, but not limited to, sales and the transfer of title of goods.

(g) For purposes of this section, a “buyer’s fee” is any amount that is in addition to the accepted auction bid price, taxes, vehicle registration fees, certificate of compliance or noncompliance fee, or any dealer document preparation charge, which is charged to a purchaser by an auctioning dealer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 672, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

11713.12.

(a) The decal required by subdivision (c) of Section 1793.23 of the Civil Code to be affixed by a manufacturer to a motor vehicle, shall be affixed to the left front doorframe of the vehicle, or, if the vehicle does not have a left front doorframe, it shall be affixed in a location designated by the department. The decal shall specify that title to the motor vehicle has been inscribed with the notation “Lemon Law Buyback” and shall be affixed to the vehicle in a manner prescribed by the department.

(b) No person shall knowingly remove or alter any decal affixed to a vehicle pursuant to subdivision (a), whether or not licensed under this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 503, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

11713.13.

It is unlawful and a violation of this code for any manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch licensed under this code to do, directly or indirectly through an affiliate, any of the following:

(a) Prevent, or attempt to prevent, by contract or otherwise, a dealer from acquiring, adding, or maintaining a sales or service operation for another line-make of motor vehicles at the same or expanded facility at which the dealer currently operates a dealership if the dealer complies with any reasonable facilities and capital requirements of the manufacturer or distributor.

(b) Require a dealer to establish or maintain
 exclusive facilities, personnel, or display space if the imposition of the requirement would be unreasonable in light of all existing circumstances, including economic conditions. In any proceeding in which the reasonableness of a facility or capital requirement is an issue, the manufacturer or distributor shall have the burden of proof.

(c) Require, by contract or otherwise, a dealer to make a material alteration, expansion, or addition to any dealership facility, unless the required alteration, expansion, or addition is reasonable in light of all existing circumstances, including economic conditions and advancements in vehicular technology. This subdivision does not limit the obligation of a dealer to comply with any applicable health or safety laws.

(1) A required facility
 alteration, expansion, or addition shall not be deemed reasonable if it requires that the dealer purchase goods or services from a specific vendor when goods or services of substantially similar kind, quality, and general design concept are available from another vendor. Notwithstanding the prohibitions in this paragraph, a manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, distributor branch, or affiliate may require the dealer to request approval for the use of alternative goods or services in writing. Approval for these requests shall not be unreasonably withheld, and the request shall be deemed approved if not specifically denied in writing within 20 business days of receipt of the dealer’s written request. This paragraph does not authorize a dealer to impair or eliminate the intellectual property or trademark rights of the manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, distributor branch, or
 affiliate, or to permit a dealer to erect or maintain signs that do not conform to the intellectual property usage guidelines of the manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, distributor branch, or affiliate. This paragraph shall not apply to a specific good or service if the manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, distributor branch, or affiliate provides the dealer with a lump-sum payment or series of payments toward a substantial portion of the cost of that good or service, if the payment is intended solely to reimburse the dealer for the purchase of the specified good or service.

(2) In any proceeding in which a required facility alteration, expansion, or addition is an issue, the manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, distributor branch, or affiliate shall have the burden of proof.

(3) (A) A required facility alteration, expansion, or addition shall not be deemed reasonable if the facility has been modified within the last 10 years at a cost of more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), and the modification was required, or was made for the purposes of complying with a franchisor’s brand image program, and was approved by the manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, distributor branch, or affiliate.

(B) This paragraph does not apply to a specific facility alteration, expansion, or addition that is necessary to enable the sale or service of zero-emission or near-zero-emission vehicles, as defined in Section 44258 of the Health and Safety Code.

(C) This paragraph does
 not apply to a specific facility alteration, expansion, or addition involving the exercise of the franchisor’s trademark rights that is necessary to erect or maintain signs or to the use of any trademark.

(D) This paragraph does not apply to a specific facility alteration, expansion, or addition that is necessary to comply with any applicable health or safety laws.

(E) This paragraph does not apply to the installation of specialized equipment that is necessary to service a vehicle offered by a franchisor and available for sale by the franchisee.

(F) This paragraph does not apply to voluntary written agreements signed by both parties between a franchisee and a manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, distributor
 branch, or affiliate.

(d) (1) Fail to pay to a dealer, within 90 days of termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of a franchise, all of the following:

(A) The dealer cost, plus any charges made by the manufacturer or distributor for vehicle distribution or delivery and the cost of any dealer-installed original equipment accessories, less any amount invoiced to the vehicle and paid by the manufacturer or distributor to the dealer, for all new and undamaged vehicles with less than 500 miles in the dealer’s inventory that were acquired by the dealer from the manufacturer, distributor, or another new motor vehicle dealer franchised to sell vehicles of the same line-make, in the ordinary course of business, within 18 months of termination, cancellation,
 or nonrenewal of the franchise.

(B) The dealer cost for all unused and undamaged supplies, parts, and accessories listed in the manufacturer’s current parts catalog and in their original packaging, except that sheet metal may be packaged in a comparable substitute for the original package.

(C) The fair market value of each undamaged sign owned by the motor vehicle dealer and bearing a common name, trade name, or trademark of the manufacturer or distributor if acquisition of the sign was required or made a condition of participation in an incentive program by the manufacturer or distributor.

(D) The fair market value of all special tools, computer systems, and equipment that were required or made a condition of participation
 in an incentive program by the manufacturer or distributor that are in usable condition, excluding normal wear and tear.

(E) The dealer costs of handling, packing, loading, and transporting any items or inventory for repurchase by the manufacturer or distributor.

(2) This subdivision does not apply to a franchisor of a dealer of new recreational vehicles, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 18010 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) This subdivision does not apply to a termination that is implemented as a result of the sale of substantially all of the inventory and fixed assets or stock of a franchised dealership if the dealership continues to operate as a franchisee of the same line-make.

(e) (1) (A) Fail to pay to a dealer of new recreational vehicles, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 18010 of the Health and Safety Code, within 90 days of termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of a franchise for a recreational vehicle line-make, as defined in Section 3072.5, the dealer cost, plus any charges made by the manufacturer or distributor for vehicle distribution or delivery and the cost of any dealer-installed original equipment accessories, less any amount invoiced to the vehicle and paid by the manufacturer or distributor to the dealer, for a new recreational vehicle when the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal is initiated by a recreational vehicle manufacturer. This paragraph only applies to new and unused recreational vehicles that do not currently have or have had
 in the past, material damage, as defined in Section 9990, and that the dealer acquired from the manufacturer, distributor, or another new motor vehicle dealer franchised to sell recreational vehicles of the same line-make in the ordinary course of business within 12 months of the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of the franchise.

(B) For those recreational vehicles with odometers, paragraph (1) shall apply to only those vehicles that have no more than 1,500 miles on the odometer, in addition to the number of miles incurred while delivering the vehicle from the manufacturer’s facility that produced the vehicle for delivery to the dealer’s retail location.

(C) Damaged recreational vehicles shall be repurchased by the manufacturer provided there is an offset in value for damages, except
 recreational vehicles that have or had material damage, as defined in Section 9990, may be repurchased at the manufacturer’s option provided there is an offset in value for damages.

(2) Fail to pay to a dealer of new recreational vehicles, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 18010 of the Health and Safety Code, within 90 days of termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of a franchise, all of the following:

(A) The dealer cost for all unused and undamaged supplies, parts, and accessories listed in the manufacturer’s current parts catalog and in their original packaging, except that sheet metal may be packaged in a comparable substitute for the original package.

(B) The fair market value of each undamaged sign owned by the
 motor vehicle dealer and bearing a common name, trade name, or trademark of the manufacturer or distributor if acquisition of the sign was required or made a condition of participation in an
 incentive program by the manufacturer or distributor.

(C) The fair market value of all special tools, computer systems, and equipment that were required or made a condition of participation in an incentive program by the manufacturer or distributor that are in usable condition, excluding normal wear and tear.

(D) The dealer costs of handling, packing, loading, and transporting any items or inventory for repurchase by the manufacturer or distributor.

(f) (1) Fail, upon demand, to indemnify any existing or former franchisee and the franchisee’s successors and assigns from any and all damages sustained and attorney’s fees and other expenses reasonably incurred by the franchisee
 that result from or relate to any claim made or asserted by a third party against the franchisee to the extent the claim results from any of the following:

(A) The condition, characteristics, manufacture, assembly, or design of any vehicle, parts, accessories, tools, or equipment, or the selection or combination of parts or components manufactured or distributed by the manufacturer or distributor.

(B) Service systems, procedures, or methods the franchisor required or recommended the franchisee to use if the franchisee properly uses the system, procedure, or method.

(C) Improper use or disclosure by a manufacturer or distributor of nonpublic personal information obtained from a franchisee concerning any consumer, customer, or
 employee of the franchisee.

(D) Any act or omission of the manufacturer or distributor for which the franchisee would have a claim for contribution or indemnity under applicable law or under the franchise, irrespective of and without regard to any prior termination or expiration of the franchise.

(E) Any act or omission of the franchisee that is the result of the franchisee’s use of a service provided by a digital vendor preselected by a franchisor and the use of that service violates California law. For purposes of this subdivision, a “service provided by a digital vendor” includes any electronic system that manages consumer data or generates consumer notices or documentation.

(2) Require a franchisee to indemnify
 its franchisor, or any third party, for the actions of the franchisee that were properly made in compliance with a franchisor’s policy, program, or requirement.

(3) This subdivision does not limit, in any way, the existing rights, remedies, or recourses available to any person who purchases or leases vehicles at retail.

(g) (1) Establish or maintain a performance standard, sales objective, or program for measuring a dealer’s sales, service, or customer service performance that may materially affect the dealer, including, but not limited to, the dealer’s right to payment under any incentive or reimbursement program or establishment of working capital requirements, unless both of the following requirements are satisfied:

(A) The performance standard, sales objective, or program for measuring dealership sales, service, or customer service performance is reasonable in light of all existing circumstances, including, but not limited to, the following:

(i) Demographics in the dealer’s area of responsibility.

(ii) Geographical and market characteristics in the dealer’s area of responsibility.

(iii) The availability and allocation of vehicles and parts inventory.

(iv) Local and statewide economic circumstances.

(v) Historical sales, service, and customer service performance of the line-make within the dealer’s area of
 responsibility, including vehicle brand preferences of consumers in the dealer’s area of responsibility.

(B) Within 30 days after a request by the dealer, the manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, distributor branch, or affiliate provides a written summary of the methodology and data used in establishing the performance standard, sales objective, or program for measuring dealership sales or service performance. The summary shall be in detail sufficient to permit the dealer to determine how the standard was established and applied to the dealer.

(2) In any proceeding in which the reasonableness of a performance standard, sales objective, or program for measuring dealership sales, service, or customer service performance is an issue, the manufacturer,
 manufacturer branch, distributor, distributor branch, or affiliate shall have the burden of proof.

(3) As used in this subdivision, “area of responsibility” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (z) of Section 11713.3.

(h) Restrict the ability of a dealer to select a digital service of a dealer’s choice that is offered by a vendor of the dealer’s choice, provided that the service offered by the vendor is approved by the manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, distributor branch, or affiliate. Approval for services selected by dealers shall not be unreasonably withheld. For purposes of this subdivision, digital service includes, but is not limited to, internet website and data management services, but does not include warranty repair processes for a vehicle.

(i) Restrict, limit, or discourage a franchisee from checking or verifying the applicability of a technical service bulletin or customer service campaign to any vehicle.

(j) Implement or modify a vehicle reservation system for the sale or lease of motor vehicles that does not comply with either of the following requirements:

(1) Any vehicle reservation system designed, implemented, or
 controlled by a franchisor that allocates vehicles to franchisees shall use customer dealer selection or other objective criteria to allocate the vehicles.

(2) At least 30 days prior to implementing a vehicle reservation system, a franchisor shall make available to its franchisees a description of the reservation program rules and requirements to franchisees through the system, as applicable. Notice of any change to such criteria shall be provided at least 30 days prior to it becoming effective.

(k) (1) Implement a program or policy that
 coerces or requires the franchisee to install direct current fast charging stations, unless all of the following are satisfied:

(A) If the program or policy requires public access to the direct current fast charging stations, the franchisor shall reimburse the dealer for one-half of all costs to install and maintain the stations, if the dealer
 pays
 the franchisor one-half of the net income generated from the ongoing use of the stations. This subparagraph shall not apply to a manufacturer program or policy that encourages the franchisee to install publicly accessible direct current fast charging stations, if the program or policy reimburses the dealer for no less than one-half of the cost of all direct current fast charging stations subject to the program or policy. 

(B) The program or policy does not limit the ability of a franchisee to use all available incentives or utility rate plans to minimize total installation cost.

(C) The program or policy does not require installation of more than the number and type of electric vehicle charging stations reasonably necessary to conduct service and sales operations.

(D) The program or policy must be reasonable in light of
 supply constraints, time constraints, advancements in vehicular technology, and electric grid integration.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the term “coerce” shall mean the use of force or threats to persuade, constrain, or compel a franchisee to take a specific action. “Coerce” includes, but is not limited to, threatening to withhold vehicles or parts from a franchisee or charging a franchisee a higher price for vehicles or parts on the basis of the franchisee refusing, declining, or failing to perform a specific behavior. 

(l) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Affiliate” means a person who directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under the common direction and control with, another person. “Control” means the possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of any person.

(2) “Facility” or “facilities” includes, but is not limited to, premises, places, buildings, or structures.

(3) “Vehicle reservation system” means a process that is used
 to hold open the opportunity for a specified consumer to place an order for the purchase or lease of a new motor vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 332, Sec. 5.   (AB 473)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11713.14.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person who purchases a vehicle that is sold through a dealer at an auction of vehicles open to the general public shall have the same rights and remedies against the dealer who conducts the auction sale as if that dealer were the owner and seller of the auctioned vehicle. The purchaser’s rights and remedies are in addition to any right or remedy he or she may have against an owner of a vehicle sold at a public auto auction.

(b) If any claim or action is filed against a dealer pursuant to subdivision (a) and the vehicle that is the subject of the claim or action was owned by a person other than the dealer at the time of sale by auction, the owner of the vehicle that consigned it to the dealer shall indemnify the dealer for any liability resulting from misrepresentations or other misconduct by the consignor.

(c) A purchaser’s rights and remedies under this section may not be waived or modified by an agreement or by a recharacterization of the sales transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 672, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

11713.15.

(a) (1) Prior to being issued a temporary branch license for selling new recreational vehicles, as defined in Section 18010 of the Health and Safety Code, at a show, a dealer shall submit to the department a manufacturer’s written authorization for the sale specifying the dates of the show, the location of the show, and the makes of those new recreational vehicles being offered for sale.

(2) If nine or fewer dealers are participating in the show, a temporary branch license may only be issued to a dealer under this subdivision if the location of the show is 50 miles or less from that dealer’s established place of business or permanent branch location.

Each
 dealer described in this paragraph shall certify in his or her application for a temporary branch license that the show location is 50 miles or less from his or her established place of business or permanent branch location.

(3) A temporary branch license may be issued to a dealer for purposes of participating in a show if all of the following conditions exist:

(A) The location of the show is 50 miles or more from the dealer’s place of business or that dealer’s branch locations, or both.

(B) Ten or more dealers apply for temporary branch licenses for purposes of participating in that show.

(C) Not less than 10 days prior to the conduct of the show, the department receives at least 10 applications for temporary branch licenses together at one of the
 department’s field offices.

(b) (1) Any advertising and promotional materials designed to attract the public to attend a show of recreational vehicles where there are nine or fewer dealers participating shall include the business name of each participating dealer and that dealer’s established place of business in a type size that is equivalent to the second largest type used in the advertisement or promotional materials. This information shall be placed at the top of any advertisement or promotional materials.

(2) If the recreational vehicles being offered for sale are used, the word “used” shall immediately precede the identification of the make of the vehicle or be immediately adjacent to the depiction of any used vehicles.

(3) In addition, the promoters of the show shall cause a sign to be
 conspicuously displayed at the major, public entrance leading directly to the show, printed in 50-point type, containing the information required in paragraph (1).

(c) A recreational vehicle dealer participating in a show for which a temporary branch license is required shall provide each buyer, prior to the sale of any vehicle at the show, a written statement disclosing the identity and the established business location of the dealer that has agreed to render service or warranty work with respect to the vehicle being purchased by the buyer, and if there is no agreement with any dealer to render the service or warranty, to state that fact.

(d) Paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a) and subdivision (b) do not apply to a dealer participating in an annual show sponsored by a national trade association of recreational vehicle manufacturers, if the show is located in a county with a
 population of 9,000,000 or more persons, or is at a location within 30 miles from the prior approved location of the show, and at least 10 manufacturers are participating in the show. If the dealer is otherwise eligible to participate in the show, the department shall issue a temporary branch license if all the following occur:

(1) A national trade association of recreational vehicle manufacturers submits a letter to the department that certifies its status as a national trade association of recreational vehicle manufacturers and specifies the dates and location of the show.

(2) Upon receipt of the letter from a national trade association described in paragraph (1) notifying the department of the dates and location of the show, the department provides written acknowledgment to the national trade association submitting the letter.

(3) Each dealer participating in the show attaches a copy of the department letter described in paragraph (2) to the application for a temporary branch license submitted to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 537, Sec. 1.   (AB 2330)   Effective September 19, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11713.16.

It is a violation of this code for the holder of any dealer’s license issued under this article to do any of the following:

(a) Advertise any used vehicle of the current or prior model-year without expressly disclosing the vehicle as “used,” “previously owned,” or a similar term that indicates that the vehicle is used, as defined in this code.

(b) Use the terms “on approved credit” or “on credit approval” in an advertisement for the sale of a vehicle unless those terms are clearly and conspicuously disclosed and unabbreviated.

(c) Advertise an amount described by terms such as “unpaid balance” or “balance can be financed” unless the total sale price is clearly and conspicuously disclosed and in close proximity to the advertised balance.

(d) Advertise credit terms that fail to comply with the disclosure requirements of Section 226.24 of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations. Advertisements of terms that include escalated payments, balloon payments, or deferred downpayments shall clearly and conspicuously identify those payments as to amounts and time due.

(e) Advertise as the total sales
 price of a vehicle an amount that includes a deduction for a rebate. However, a dealer may advertise a separate amount that includes a deduction for a rebate provided that the advertisement clearly and conspicuously discloses, in close proximity to the amount advertised, the price of the vehicle before the rebate deduction and the amount of the rebate, each so identified. A dealer may not advertise a rebate deduction that conflicts with another advertised rebate deduction.

(f) Advertise claims such as “everyone financed,” “no credit rejected,” or similar claims unless the dealer is willing to extend credit to any person under any and all circumstances.

(g) Advertise the amount of any downpayment unless it represents the total payment required of a purchaser prior to delivery of the vehicle, including any payment for sales tax or license. Statements such as “$_____ delivers,”
 “$____ puts you in a new car” are examples of advertised downpayments.

(h) Advertise the price of a new vehicle or class of new vehicles unless the vehicle or vehicles have all of the equipment listed as standard by the manufacturer or distributor or the dealer has replaced the standard equipment with equipment of higher value.

(i) Fail to clearly and conspicuously disclose in an advertisement for the sale of a vehicle any disclosure required by this code or any qualifying term used in conjunction with advertised credit terms. Unless otherwise provided by statute, the specific size of disclosures or qualifying terms is not prescribed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 856, Sec. 3.   (AB 1732)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

11713.17.

(a) Following the retail sale or lease of a motor vehicle for which the department issues two license plates, a dealer may not deliver the motor vehicle unless either of the following occurs:

(1) The motor vehicle is equipped with a bracket or other means of securing a front license plate.

(2) The dealer obtains a signed written acknowledgment from the person taking delivery of the motor vehicle acknowledging
 both of the following:

(A) The person expressly refused installation of a bracket or other means of securing the front license plate.

(B) The person understands that California law requires a license plate to be displayed from and securely fastened to the front of the motor vehicle and that the hardware necessary to securely fasten the front plate is available from the dealer.

(b) A manufacturer or distributor may not sell or distribute in this state a new motor vehicle for which the department issues two license plates, unless that motor vehicle is equipped or provided with a bracket or other means of securing the license plates.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 365, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

11713.18.
